Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 60 Miscellaneous Proceedings Relating to Property
18-60-420. Sale of land not susceptible to division.

(a)

If the commissioners appointed under this subchapter report to the court that all or part of the land or tenements of which partition had been directed are so situated that partition cannot be made without great prejudice to the owners of the land or tenements, the court may, if satisfied that the report is just and correct, make an order that the commissioners sell all or part of the land or tenements:

(1)

At public auction to the highest bidder; or

(2)

By a negotiated sale under terms and conditions established by the court, including without limitation by engaging a licensed real estate broker to sell the land or tenements.

(b)

The court making the order of sale shall therein direct the terms and conditions, time and place of sale, the credit, if any, and the security to be taken.

(c)

The commissioners shall give notice of the time and place and terms of any sale to be made by them, in accordance with the order of the court directing the sale.

(d)(1)

If the premises consist of distinct farms, buildings, tracts, or lots of land, they shall be sold separately.

(2)

When any tract of land or lot can be divided for the purpose of sale, with advantage to the parties interested, it may be so divided and sold in parcels.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, §§ 23-26; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8111-8114; Pope's Dig., §§ 10532-10535; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1826 — 34-1829; Acts 2013, No. 1184, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2013, No. 1184, § 1, provided:

“Findings and intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Current law concerning partition actions is susceptible of an interpretation that all partition sales are required to be conducted at public auction;

“(2)

Requiring all partition sales to be conducted at public auction may be contrary to the interests of the property owners in some circumstances;

“(3)

The interest of affected property owners may be better served by permitting courts to order a negotiated sale of property that is being partitioned; and

“(4)

Permitting courts additional flexibility to order the best manner for conducting a partition sale is a procedural change that should be implemented immediately.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to allow a court in a partition action to:

“(1)

Order the sale of all or part of the property to be sold by a negotiated sale;

“(2)

Establish the terms and conditions of the negotiated sale; and

“(3)

To permit the change in the procedure for selling property in a partition action authorized by this act to apply to cases filed after the effective date of this act.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (a)(2) and the (1) designation; and, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “under this subchapter” for “shall”, inserted “all or part of”, deleted “or that any lot or portion thereof is so situated” preceding “that partition”, deleted “thereof” preceding “cannot”, substituted “of the land or tenements” for “thereof”, and substituted “all or part of the land or tenements” for “the premises so situated”.

18-60-421. Commissioners or other interested parties not to purchase.

(a)(1)

No commissioner nor any person for his or her benefit shall purchase or be directly or indirectly interested in the purchase of any of the premises sold.

(2)

No guardian of any minor or person of unsound mind party to the proceedings shall purchase or be interested in the purchase of any of the lands the subject of the proceedings except for the benefit or in behalf of his or her ward.

(b)

All sales contrary to the provisions of this section shall be void.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, § 27; C. & M. Dig., § 8115; Pope's Dig., § 10536; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1830.

18-60-422. Report and confirmation of sale — Conveyances.

(a)

After completing the sale, the commissioners shall report their proceedings to the court, on their oath, with a description of the different parcels of the land sold, the name of the purchaser, and the price bid by him or her, and the report shall be filed in the court.

(b)

If the sale is approved and confirmed by the court, an order shall be entered, directing the commissioners, or a majority of them, to execute conveyances pursuant to the sale, and the commissioners shall execute the conveyances accordingly.

(c)

The conveyances so executed shall be acknowledged or proven and recorded in the same manner as other conveyances of lands, and shall be a bar, both in law and equity, against all persons interested in the premises who shall have been parties to the proceedings and against all other persons claiming from or under the parties, or either of them, by title derived after suit commenced.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, §§ 28-30, C. & M. Dig., §§ 8116-8118; Pope's Dig., §§ 10537-10539, A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1831 — 34-1833.

18-60-423. Distribution of sale proceeds.

The proceeds of every sale, after deducting the costs and expenses of the proceedings, shall be divided among the parties whose rights and interests shall have been sold, in proportion to their respective rights in the premises, and shall be paid to them, their guardians, or legal representatives by the commissioners.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, § 31; C. & M. Dig., § 8119; Pope's Dig., § 10540; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1834.

Cross References.

Land held by joint tenants, payment of tax and penalties from proceeds of sale, §26-35-303.

Life interests and remainders, determination of present value, §18-2-101 et seq.

18-60-424. Sale without commissioners.

The court may order a sale without the appointment of commissioners if the court determines from the evidence presented that there is no necessity for the appointment of commissioners.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 107, § 16; Acts 1983, No. 503, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1815.

18-60-425. Sale of improved land where infant or individual with mental illness coparcener, etc.

(a)

When town or city lots, or land outside of a town or city, but having upon it a building of more value than the land, shall be held by, or in trust, for coparceners, joint tenants, or tenants in common, some of whom are infants or persons of unsound mind, the circuit court, or other court of similar jurisdiction, may, upon the complaint of a part of the owners against the others, of the trustee against the owner, or of the owners against the trustee, and upon its being proved that a division of the land would materially impair its value, order a sale thereof and the division of the proceeds among those entitled.

(b)(1)

Before the sale is ordered, the court shall appoint some suitable persons to take care of the interests of the infants or individuals with mental illness.

(2)

The shares of the infants or individuals with mental illness shall not be paid by the purchaser, but remain a lien upon the land, bearing interest, until they become capable in law of receiving their respective shares or until statutory guardians shall be appointed for the infants or individuals with mental illness, or the infants shall become married.

(3)

The guardians shall give bond as required by law.

History.

Civil Code, § 535; C. & M. Dig., § 8124; Pope's Dig., § 10546; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1836.

Cross References.

Guardians generally, §28-65-101 et seq.

18-60-426. Sale of land held jointly or otherwise by incompetent person.

(a)

The land of an incompetent person held jointly or otherwise, by survivorship, entirety, tenancy in common, joint tenancy, or howsoever held, with another or others, though not necessary for the payments of debts or maintenance, may be sold by order of the probate division of circuit court having jurisdiction over the land or guardian of the person when it shall appear to the court from legal evidence that the interest of the other owner or owners would be advanced thereby and that the interest of the incompetent person would not be injuriously affected.

(b)

The sale of the interest and the disposition of the proceeds derived therefrom shall be controlled in the same manner as provided by law in sales by guardians of real property wherein their wards have an interest.

(c)

It is the specific intent of this section to enable guardians, regardless of their wards' interest in real property, technical estate by which held, or the relationship to the ward, to sell the interest of the ward in the property subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Civil Code, § 534; C. & M. Dig., §§ 5870, 8123; Pope's Dig., §§ 7587, 10545; Acts 1949, No. 349, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1835, 34-1835n.

Subchapter 5

— Quieting Title Generally

Cross References.

Statutes of limitations, §18-61-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 13: effective on passage.

Acts 1927, No. 64, § 2: effective 90 days after passage and approval. Approved Mar. 3, 1927.

18-60-501. Proceedings generally.

Any person claiming to own land that is wild or improved or land that is in the actual possession of himself or herself, or those claiming under him or her, may have his or her title to the land confirmed and quieted by proceeding in the manner provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 1, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., § 8362; Pope's Dig., § 10958; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1901.

18-60-502. Petition.

(a)

A claimant shall file in the office of the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the land is situated a petition describing the land and stating facts which show a prima facie right and title to the land in himself or herself and that there is no adverse occupant thereof.

(b)(1)

The petitioner shall initiate a search of the following records in order to identify persons entitled to notice and shall provide notice as required under subdivision (b)(2) of this section:

(A)

Land title records in the office of the county recorder;

(B)

Tax records in the office of the county collector;

(C)

Tax records in the office of the county treasurer;

(D)

Tax records in the office of the county assessor;

(E)

For an individual, records of the probate court for the county in which the property is located;

(F)

For a partnership, partnership records filed with the county clerk; and

(G)

For a business entity other than a partnership, business entity records filed with the Secretary of State.

(2)(A)

The petitioner shall send notice by certified mail to the last known address in duplicate, with one (1) copy addressed by name to the person entitled to notice and the other copy addressed to “occupant”, and if the certified mail is returned undelivered, the petitioner shall send a second notice by regular mail.

(B)

The petitioner shall post a notice of the pending quiet title action conspicuously on the property.

(3)

If the petitioner has knowledge of any other person who has, or claims to have, interest in the lands, the petitioner shall so state, and the person or persons shall be summoned as defendants in the case.

(c)

The petitioner may embrace in his or her petition as many tracts of land as he or she sees proper so long as they all lie in the county.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, §§ 2, 10, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8363, 8364; Pope's Dig., §§ 10959, 10960; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1902, 34-1903; Acts 2007, No. 1037, § 1; 2017, No. 377, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “as required under” for “pursuant to” in the introductory language of (b)(1); and deleted (b)(1)(F) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

Parties.

Confirmation decree in favor of petitioner who acquired title through purchase of tax title was void where heirs of former owner were not named parties defendant. Welch v. Burton, 221 Ark. 173, 252 S.W.2d 411 (1952).

Cited:

Fiddyment v. Bateman, 97 Ark. 76, 133 S.W. 192 (1910); Ingram v. Luther, 244 Ark. 260, 424 S.W.2d 546 (1968); Hall v. Blanford, 254 Ark. 590, 494 S.W.2d 714 (1973).

18-60-503. Publication of notice — Cancellation of liens.

(a)(1)

Upon the filing of the petition, the clerk of the court shall publish a notice of the filing of the petition on the same day of each week, for four (4) weeks in some newspaper published in the county, if there is one, and if not, then in some newspaper having a circulation in the county.

(2)

The petition shall describe the land and call upon all persons who claim any interest in the land or lien thereon to appear in the court and show cause why the title of the petitioner should not be confirmed.

(b)

The circuit court within the proper county is authorized and empowered under the notice to find apparent existing liens on the real estate to be barred by the laws of limitation or laches and decree the cancellation of the liens and the records thereof.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 3, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., § 8366; Acts 1921, No. 307, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 10962; Acts 1955, No. 264, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1905.

18-60-504. Adjudication of rights.

If any person is summoned to appear in the cause, his or her rights shall be adjudicated according to the principles of equity.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 8, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., § 8371; Pope's Dig., § 10967; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1908.

18-60-505. Proof.

(a)

After proof of publication of the notice as stated in §18-60-503 has been filed, the court shall require the petitioner to prove all the allegations of the petition.

(b)

Proof may be by depositions or by testimony ore tenus at the bar of the court.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 4, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., § 8367; Pope's Dig., § 10963; Acts 1975, No. 459, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1906.

18-60-506. Prima facie title.

If the petitioner cannot show a perfect claim of title to any particular tract or tracts of land, it shall be held to constitute a prima facie title if the petitioner shall show that:

(1)

The petitioner and those under whom he or she claims, have had color of title to the land for more than seven (7) years; and

(2)

During that time the petitioner or those under whom he or she claims, have continuously paid the taxes thereon.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 5, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., § 8368; Pope's Dig., § 10964; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1907.

Cross References.

Adverse possession, §18-11-106.

18-60-507. Lost or destroyed title papers.

If the petitioner alleges that his or her title papers or the record thereof has been lost or destroyed, the court shall have the power to require new title papers to be executed if the party required to execute them shall have been duly summoned in the cause.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 11, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., § 8365; Pope's Dig., § 10961; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1904.

18-60-508. Decree — Effect.

(a)

If the court is satisfied as to the truth of the facts set out in the petition, it shall render a decree establishing and quieting the petitioner's title against all persons except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

The decree in the cause shall not bar or affect the rights of any person who claims through, under, or by virtue of any contract with the petitioner, or who was an adverse occupant of the land at the time the petition was filed, or any person who within seven (7) years preceding had paid the taxes on the land, or a remainderman unless the person shall have been made a defendant in the petition and personally summoned to answer it.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, §§ 4, 6, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8367, 8369; Acts 1927, No. 64, § 1; Pope's Dig., §§ 10963, 10965; Acts 1975, No. 459, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1906, 34-1909.

18-60-509. Recording of decree.

A certified copy of any decree confirming title to real estate shall be entitled to record in the books kept for the record of deeds in the county in which the decree was granted.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 12, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., § 8373; Pope's Dig., § 10969; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1912.

18-60-510. Setting aside decree.

(a)

Any person may appear within three (3) years and set aside the decree if he or she shall offer to file a meritorious defense.

(b)

Every person laboring under the disability of infancy or individuals with mental illness or intellectual disabilities, and those claiming under them, may set aside the decree at any time within three (3) years after the removal of their disability.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 7, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., § 8370; Pope's Dig., § 10966; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1910.

18-60-511. Costs.

The costs of the proceedings shall be adjudged against the petitioner if there is no other party to the proceedings, and otherwise the costs shall be adjudged according to the principles of equity.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 79, § 9, p. 133; C. & M. Dig., § 8372; Pope's Dig., § 10968; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1911.

Subchapter 6

— Quieting Title — Public Sales

Cross References.

State lands, §22-5-401.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1893, No. 72, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1893, No. 95, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1939, No. 318, § 4: effective 90 days after passage.

Acts 1951, No. 263, § 4: Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that heretofore purchasers of land in Levee and Drainage Improvement Districts acquired at foreclosure proceedings for delinquent taxes due said districts have been unable to confirm title to such lands and that enactment of this bill will provide such means. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

18-60-601. Proceedings to confirm public sales.

The purchasers, or the heirs and legal representatives of purchasers, of lands at sheriff's sales or those made by the county clerks, or by the Commissioner of State Lands, or from levee or drainage improvement districts, who have acquired title by purchase at the sale held by the sheriff or by foreclosure proceedings for taxes due the districts, in pursuance of any of the laws thereof, or those made by the order, decree, or authority of any court of record, may protect themselves from eviction of the lands so purchased, or from any responsibility as possessors of them, by proceeding in the manner provided in this subchapter.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, § 1; Acts 1881, No. 69, § 1, p. 134; C. & M. Dig., § 8379; Pope's Dig., § 10975; Acts 1951, No. 263, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1918.

Parties.

The purchaser at a tax sale being dead, his grantee need not make such purchaser's heirs or executors parties to a bill of confirmation. Scott v. Watkins, 22 Ark. 556 (1861).

18-60-602. Petition for confirmation — Affidavit.

(a)

The petition for confirmation shall be filed with the clerk of the circuit court of the county at least twenty (20) days prior to the first day of the term of court at which application is to be made.

(b)

The petitioner, if he or she is acquainted with the lands, shall file with his or her petition his or her affidavit, or the affidavit of some person who is acquainted with the lands, showing that there is no person in actual possession of the lands claiming title adverse to the petitioner, proof that taxes owed on the lands were either paid, settled, or released shall be filed with the petition and, in the case of levee or drainage improvement districts, proof of payment, settlement, or release of all delinquent taxes.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, § 3; Acts 1893, No. 95, § 2, p. 165; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8384, 8385; Pope's Dig., §§ 10980, 10981; Acts 1951, No. 263, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1920; Acts 2007, No. 1037, § 2.

18-60-603. Publication of notice.

(a)(1)

When land is not made redeemable by any law of this state applicable to the sale, or, if redeemable, at any time after the expiration of the time allowed for the redemption, at all sales which have been or may be made, the purchaser, the heirs and legal representative of the purchaser, or the assignee of the purchaser or the heirs or legal representative of the assignee, may publish a notice.

(2)

This notice shall be published four (4) weeks in succession in some newspaper published in the county where the land lies, if there is a newspaper published in the county or, if not, in the nearest newspaper having a bona fide circulation in the county.

(3)

The notice shall call on all persons who can set up any right to the land so purchased in consequence of any informality or any irregularity connected with the sale to show cause, at the first term of the circuit court of the county after the publication of the notice, why the sale so made should not be confirmed.

(4)

The notice shall state the authority under which the sale took place and give the description of the land purchased and the nature of the title by which it is held.

(b)

The last insertion of the notice in the newspaper shall be at least twenty (20) days before the application for confirmation is submitted to the court for trial.

(c)

Proof of the publication of the notice shall be made in the same manner as proof of publication of notices in other circuit court causes.

(d)

The clerk of the court shall notify any delinquent tax owner or owners at their last known address by registered mail at least twenty (20) days before the application for confirmation is submitted to the court for trial.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, § 2; Acts 1893, No. 95, § 1, p. 165; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8380-8382; Pope's Dig., §§ 10976- 10978; Acts 1951, No. 349, § 1; 1955, No. 264, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1919; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 77.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “circuit court” for “chancery” in (c).

18-60-604. Petition taken as confessed.

If the deed or deeds are in proper legal form and properly executed, if there is proof showing payment, settlement, or release of the taxes, and if the evidence shows that no one is in possession adverse to the petitioner, then in case no one has appeared to show cause against the prayer of the petitioner, the petition shall be taken as confessed and the court shall render final decrees confirming the sale in question.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, § 4; Acts 1893, No. 95, § 3, p. 165; C. & M. Dig., § 8388; Pope's Dig., § 10984; Acts 1951, No. 263, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1921; Acts 2007, No. 1037, § 3.

18-60-605. Trial of sale validity.

In case any person or persons claiming title to the land opposed the confirmation of sale, then the court shall try the validity of the sale and the court shall:

(1)

Confirm the sale if the sale was valid; or

(2)

Annul the sale if the sale has been made contrary to law.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, § 4; Acts 1893, No. 95, § 3, p. 165; C. & M. Dig., § 8389; Pope's Dig., § 10985; Acts 1951, No. 263, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1921.

18-60-606. Evidence at trial.

(a)(1)

On the trial of the cause, the petitioner shall exhibit to the court proof that taxes owed on the lands were either paid, settled, or released and, in the case of lands acquired from levee and drainage improvement districts:

(A)

All delinquent taxes that have been paid, settled, or released;

(B)

The deed or deeds under which he or she claims title, or the record thereof, or a certified copy or copies from the record; and

(C)

Oral or written proof by one (1) or more witnesses acquainted with the lands showing that no one is in possession claiming adverse to the petitioner.

(2)

The name of the witness or witnesses so sworn shall be preserved in the decree.

(b)

A sheriff's or land commissioner's deed, given in the usual form, without witnesses, shall be taken and considered by the court as sufficient evidence of the authority under which the sale was made, the description of the land, and the price at which it was purchased.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, §§ 4, 5; Acts 1893, No. 95, § 3, p. 165; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8386, 8387, 8390; Pope's Dig., §§ 10982, 10983, 10986; Acts 1951, No. 263, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1921, 34-1922; Acts 2007, No. 1037, § 4.

Cross References.

Deeds of commissioner of state lands as evidence, §22-6-108.

18-60-607. Confirmation of sale.

(a)

There should be no confirmation of the sale of any lands that are in actual possession of any person claiming title adverse to the petitioner, nor shall there be any confirmation of the sale of lands unless the petitioner or his or her grantor or those under whom he or she claims title submits proof that all taxes owed on the lands have been paid, settled, or released.

(b)

With respect to land in levee and drainage improvement districts, there shall be no confirmation of sale unless title has been acquired as referred to in §18-60-601, nor unless the petitioner or his or her grantor or grantors exhibit proof of payment, settlement, or release of all taxes that are due against the lands in the districts at the time of the rendition of the decree of confirmation by the court.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, § 3; Acts 1893, No. 95, § 2, p. 165; C. & M. Dig., § 8383; Pope's Dig., § 10979; Acts 1951, No. 263, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1920; Acts 2007, No. 1037, § 5.

18-60-608. Effect of decree confirming sale.

(a)(1)

The judgment or decree of the court confirming the sale shall operate as a complete bar against any and all persons who may thereafter claim the land in consequence of informality or illegality in the proceedings.

(2)

The title to the land shall be considered as confirmed and complete in the purchaser thereof, his or her heirs and assigns forever, saving, however, to infants, persons of unsound mind, or individuals imprisoned overseas, the right to appear and contest the title to the land within one (1) year after their disabilities may be removed.

(b)

The decree shall not be valid for any purpose as against the owner of the land, his heirs or assigns, who was, at the time of the decree rendered, in actual possession of it, unless he or she is made a party to the action by personal service of notice therein.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, § 6; Acts 1893, No. 72, § 1, p. 117; C. & M. Dig., § 8391; Pope's Dig., § 10987; Acts 1939, No. 318, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1923.

18-60-609. Effect of title not confirmed.

In case any purchaser or purchasers contemplated in any of the provisions of this subchapter, or his, her, or their heirs or assigns, shall not deem it necessary to use the remedy conferred by this subchapter to confirm the title thereto, then the sale shall have the same effect only as is given to it by the existing laws of this state.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, § 12; C. & M. Dig., § 8393; Pope's Dig., § 10989; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1925.

18-60-610. Costs.

(a)

When no opposition is made to the confirmation of the sale, the costs attending the proceedings shall be paid by the party praying for confirmation.

(b)

Where opposition is made, the costs shall be borne by the party against whom judgment is rendered.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 149, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 8392; Pope's Dig., § 10988; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1924.

Subchapter 7

— Quieting Title — Railroads

Effective Dates.

Acts 1911, No. 267, § 6: May 10, 1911. Emergency declared.

18-60-701. Proceedings against railroads, their successors and assigns.

Any person owning land that is wild and unimproved or land that is in the actual possession of himself or herself or those claiming under him or her which has, at any time, been deeded, granted, donated, or subscribed to any railroad under the provisions of an act of the General Assembly entitled, “An act in aid of internal improvement”, approved April 8, 1869, or acts amendatory and supplemental thereto, or land that is claimed to have been, at any time, deeded, granted, donated, or subscribed to any railroad under the provisions of those acts, may have his or her title thereto confirmed and quieted as against the railroad, its successors and assigns, and as against any persons so deeding or claiming to have deeded, granted, donated, or subscribed the land, or their heirs and assigns, and any and all persons claiming by, through, or under them, or either of them, by proceeding in the manner provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 267, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 8374; Pope's Dig., § 10970; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1913.

Publisher's Notes.

The act referred to in this section was Acts 1869 (Adj. Sess.), No. 65, which provided that when land sold to state for taxes was thereafter conveyed to a railroad, the taxes would be canceled. The operative provisions of the act were repealed by Acts 1887, No. 102, § 1.

18-60-702. Liberally construed.

This subchapter shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purpose.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 267, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 8378; Pope's Dig., § 10974; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1917.

18-60-703. Petition — Verification and certification.

(a)

A person may file the petition in the circuit court of the county in which the land is situated, describing the land and setting forth his or her title thereto and alleging that there is no person in the adverse possession thereof and that the land has been deeded, granted, donated, or subscribed to a railroad under the provisions of the acts mentioned in §18-60-701, or is claimed to have been so deeded, granted, donated, or subscribed, and praying that title thereto may be confirmed and quieted as against the railroad, its successors and assigns, and as against any persons deeding, granting, donating, or subscribing the land, or claimed to have deeded, granted, donated, or subscribed the land, or their heirs and assigns, and all others claiming by, through, or under them, or either of them.

(b)

Any number of tracts may be embraced in the same petition when they all lie in the same county.

(c)

The petition shall be verified, and there shall be endorsed thereon a certificate of the attorney filing the petition to the effect that he or she has examined the title of the petitioner as set forth in the petition and that in his or her opinion the petition is well founded in law and true in fact. When so verified and certified, the petition shall be taken as prima facie true, and the petitioner shall be entitled to a decree thereon.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 267, §§ 2, 4; C. & M. Dig., §§ 8375, 8377; Pope's Dig., §§ 10971, 10973; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 34-1914, 34-1916.

18-60-704. Publication of notice.

Upon the filing of the petition, the clerk of the court shall publish for four (4) weeks in some weekly newspaper published in the county a notice of the filing of the petition, describing the lands and the alleged conveyance to the railroad as set forth in the petition, and calling upon all persons claiming any interest in the lands to appear at the next term of the circuit court of the county and show cause, if they can, why the title of the petitioner should not be confirmed and quieted in him or her as against the railroad, its successors and assigns, and the alleged grantor, his or her heirs and assigns, and all others claiming by, through, or under them, or either of them.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 267, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 8376; Pope's Dig., § 10972; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1915.

18-60-705. Proof — Determination.

If any person appears to contest the petition, the burden of proof shall rest upon the person so appearing, and the court shall determine the rights of the parties in accordance with the principles and practice in equity and decree accordingly.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 267, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 8377; Pope's Dig., § 10973; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1916.

18-60-706. Recording of decree.

A certified copy of the decree shall be entitled to record in the deed records of the county where rendered.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 267, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 8378; Pope's Dig., § 10974; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1917.

18-60-707. Effect of decree.

The decree in any such cause shall be an absolute bar as against the title of any railroad, its successors and assigns, and the person deeding or claimed to have deeded, granted, donated, or subscribed the lands to the railroads, his or her heirs and assigns, and all others claiming the lands by, through, or under them, or either of them.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 267, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 8378; Pope's Dig., § 10974; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1917.

18-60-708. Costs.

The petitioner shall pay the costs when there is no contest, and in case of contest, the cost shall be adjudged by the court.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 267, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 8377; Pope's Dig., § 10973; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1916.

Subchapter 8

— Recovery of Personal Property and Replevin

Effective Dates.

Acts 1871, No. 48, § 1 [890]: effective 90 days after passage.

Acts 1875 (Adj. Sess.), No. 86, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1885, No. 12, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1887, No. 29, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1973, No. 144, § 10: Feb. 19, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined by the General Assembly that, due to the decision of the Supreme Court of the United States in Fuentes v. Shevin, decided June 12, 1972, holding that writs of replevin cannot constitutionally issue without prior notice to the party in possession of personal property, there exists doubt as to the constitutionality of the Arkansas replevin laws. Due to the uncertainty created by the foregoing decision, persons with an enforceable right in personal property are being denied a procedure which enables such rights to be properly enforced, and the value of property held as collateral for loans, or for other reasons, is in danger of diminishing during the interim when such enforcement is delayed. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of passage and approval.”

18-60-801. Definitions.

As used in this section and §§18-60-802 —18-60-808:

(1)

“Order of delivery” means a “writ of replevin”; and

(2)

“Party” or “person” means individuals, corporations, partnerships, associations, or any entity having the legal capacity to sue or be sued.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 144, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2125.

18-60-802. Existing laws not affected.

This section and §§18-60-801 and18-60-803 —18-60-808 shall not repeal any existing law pertaining to the recovery of personal property by parties claiming an interest therein.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 144, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2126.

18-60-803. Penalties — Damages and fee.

(a)

Any person who willfully and knowingly damages property in which there exists a valid right to issuance of an order of delivery, or on which an order has been sought under the provisions of this section and §§18-60-801 —18-60-802 and18-60-804 —18-60-808, or who conceals it, with the intent to interfere with enforcement of the order, or who removes it from the jurisdiction of the court in which the action is pending with the intention of defeating enforcement of an order of delivery, or who willfully refuses to disclose its location to an officer charged with executing an order for its delivery, or, if the property is in his or her possession, willfully interferes with the officer charged with executing the writ shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b)

If convicted, he or she shall be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and imprisonment for a term of not more than six (6) months, or both.

(c)

In addition to these criminal penalties, he or she shall be liable to the plaintiff for double the amount of damage done to the property, together with a reasonable attorney's fee, to be fixed by the court, and the damages and fee shall be deemed based on tortious conduct and enforceable accordingly.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 144, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2124.

18-60-804. Petition for recovery of personal property.

(a)

In all cases in this state wherein a party claims a right of possession of property in the possession of another, the party may apply to the circuit court or the district court for issuance of an order of delivery of the property. The application shall be by petition, signed by the party or his or her attorney, and shall set forth the reasons the issuance of the order of delivery is necessary.

(b)

The petition may be presented to the circuit judge, who is empowered to hear it in any county of the district he or she serves, and he or she may issue an order giving notice of hearing to be held in any county in his or her district.

(c)

The petition may be brought in the district court at the election of the party so filing, and the district court shall have authority to give notice and hear the petition in the same manner as the circuit court.

(d)

If the petition recites facts which, if established by proof, support the existence of a right of possession in the petitioner, an order shall be issued, directing the party against whom the order of delivery is sought to appear before the judge issuing the order and show cause why the order of delivery should not be issued and the property seized and delivered to the petitioner.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 144, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2119.

18-60-805. Notice of hearing.

(a)

The order to appear and show cause why the order of delivery should not be issued shall permit a reasonable time for the party against whom it is directed to appear. It shall state the place and time the hearing shall be held.

(b)(1)(A)

If served at the same time the summons and complaint are served, it may state with generality the nature of the action, the purpose of the hearing, and the consequences of nonappearance.

(B)

If served after the summons and complaint, and separately therefrom, it shall refer to the complaint and, in addition to the foregoing, specifically describe the property to be seized if the petition is granted.

(2)

In either event, the order shall inform the party against whom it is directed that civil and criminal penalties may be assessed if the property is willfully damaged, concealed, or removed from the court's jurisdiction, or if the party refuses to release the property to the officer designated to serve the order of delivery.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 144, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2120.

18-60-806. Hearing.

(a)

At any hearing held on an application for an order of delivery, the petitioner shall be required to present prima facie evidence that the petitioner has the right of immediate possession of the property.

(b)

If the party against whom the order of delivery is sought should fail to appear in response to the notice, the petitioner shall be required to offer the same proof necessary to secure a default judgment.

(c)

If the court decides that the order of delivery should issue, an order shall be entered accordingly.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 144, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2121.

18-60-807. Immediate appearance — Impounding of property.

If the petitioner for an order of delivery, after otherwise complying with the requirements for issuance thereof, shall present evidence to the court that there is genuine danger that the property sought under the order will be removed from the court's jurisdiction, damaged, concealed, or otherwise jeopardized, the court shall have the power to direct the immediate appearance of the party having possession thereof or, if the party cannot be immediately served but the property can be located, to direct that the property be taken and impounded pending further hearing, in which event it shall be deemed in custodia legis, subject to possession by neither party without further order of the court.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 144, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2122.